Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.802

Contingency—Null and void—Team affiliate's agreement for reimbursement for election—1997 c 220.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, this act shall be null and void in its entirety unless the team affiliate as defined in RCW 36.102.010 enters into an agreement with the secretary of state to reimburse the state and the counties for the full cost of the special election to be held on or before June 20, 1997.

[ 1997 c 220 s 606 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The team affiliate entered into an agreement with the secretary of state on May 14, 1997, for reimbursement of the full cost of the special election.

Effective date—1997 c 220 ss 606 and 607: "Sections 606 and 607 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [April 26, 1997]." [ 1997 c 220 s 608.]